Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska27-1001
Rule 1001. Definitions; writings and recordings, photographs, original, and duplicate.

For purposes of this article the following definitions are applicable:

(1) Writings and recordings consist of letters, words, or numbers, or their equivalent, set down by handwriting, typewriting, printing, photostating, photographing, magnetic impulse, mechanical or electronic recording, or other form of data compilation;

(2) Photographs include still photographs, X-ray films, video tapes, and motion pictures;

(3) An original of a writing or recording is the writing or recording itself or any counterpart intended to have the same effect by a person executing or issuing it. An original of a photograph includes the negative or any print therefrom. If data are stored in a computer or similar device, any printout or other output readable by sight, shown to reflect the data accurately, is an original; and

(4) A duplicate is a counterpart produced by the same impression as the original, or from the same matrix, or by means of photography, including enlargements and miniatures, or by mechanical or electronic rerecording, or by chemical reproduction, or by other equivalent techniques which accurately reproduce the original.

Laws 1975, LB 279, § 64.

A bank photocopy of a processed check qualifies as a duplicate under subsection (4) of this section. Equitable Life v. Starr, 241 Neb. 609, 489 N.W.2d 857 (1992).